Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.300

Proceeds from sale of impounded cattle and horses—Paid to director.

The proceeds from the sale of cattle and horses when impounded under RCW 16.57.290, after paying the cost thereof, shall be paid to the director, who shall make a record showing the brand or marks or other method of identification of the animals and the amount realized from the sale thereof. However, the proceeds from a sale of the cattle or horses at a licensed public livestock market shall be held by the licensee for a reasonable period not to exceed thirty days to permit the consignor to establish ownership or the right to sell the cattle or horses. If the consignor fails to establish legal ownership or the right to sell the cattle or horses, the proceeds shall be paid to the director to be disposed of as any other estray proceeds.

[ 2013 c 313 s 4; 2003 c 326 s 36; 1989 c 286 s 24; 1981 c 296 s 21; 1959 c 54 s 30.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.